Vermont, session 2025-2026, H834.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 1007 is amended to read:
§ 1007. LOCAL SPEED LIMITS
* * *
(g) Notwithstanding any requirements of section 1025 of this title,
downtown development districts designated under 24 V.S.A. chapter 76A an
area that is a downtown center or village center pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 5803
may have posted speed limits of less than 25 miles per hour.
(h)(1) As used in this subsection, “thickly settled district” means a portion
of State, city, town, or village highway, or any combination of these, that:
(A) is at least one-fifth of a mile in length; and
(B) has commercial, industrial, or residential structures, or any
combination of the three, located along it that are an average of 200 feet or less
from each other.
(2) The legislative body of a municipality may by a majority vote
designate as a thickly settled district any portion of highway located in the
VT LEG #386129 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.834
2026 Page 3 of 15
jurisdiction of the municipality that meets the requirements of subdivision (1)
of this subsection.
(3) Notwithstanding any requirements of section 1025 of this title, the
legislative body of a municipality may by a majority vote establish a speed
limit of 25 miles per hour on any highway in a thickly settled district
designated pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection.
Sec. 2. 24 V.S.A. § 5803 is amended to read:
§ 5803. DESIGNATION OF DOWNTOWN AND VILLAGE CENTERS
* * *
(f) Benefits Steps. A center may receive the benefits associated with the
steps in this section by meeting the established requirements. The Department
shall review applications from municipalities to advance from Step One to
Two and from Step Two to Three and issue written decisions. The Department
shall issue a written administrative decision within 30 days following an
application. If a municipal application is rejected by the Department, the
municipality may appeal the administrative decision to the State Board. To
maintain a downtown approved under chapter 76A after December 31, 2026,
the municipality shall apply for renewal following a regional planning
approval by the LURB and meet the program requirements. Step Three
designations that are not approved for renewal revert to Step Two. The
municipality may appeal the administrative decision of the Department to the
VT LEG #386129 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.834
2026 Page 4 of 15
State Board. Appeals of administrative decisions shall be heard by the State
Board at the next meeting following a timely filing stating the reasons for the
appeal. The State Board’s decision is final. The Department shall issue
guidance to administer these steps.
(1) Step One.
(A) Requirements. Step One is established to create an accessible
designation for all villages throughout the State to become eligible for funding
and technical assistance to support site-based improvements and planning. All
downtown and village centers shall automatically reach Step One upon
approval of the regional plan future land use map by the LURB. Regional plan
future land use maps supersede preexisting designated areas that may already
meet the Step One requirement.
(B) Benefits. A center that reaches Step One is eligible for the
following benefits:
(i) funding and technical assistance eligibility for site-based
projects, including the Better Places Grant Program under section 5810 of this
chapter, access to the Downtown and Village Center Tax Credit Program
described in 32 V.S.A. § 5930aa et seq., and other programs identified in the
Department’s guidance; and
(ii) funding priority for developing or amending the municipal
plan, visioning, and assessments; and
VT LEG #386129 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.834
2026 Page 5 of 15
(iii) authority for the municipal legislative body to establish speed
limits of less than 25 mph within the center under 23 V.S.A. § 1007(g).
(2) Step Two.
* * *
(B) Benefits. In addition to the benefits of Step One, a center that
reaches Step Two is eligible for the following benefits:
* * *
(v) authority for the municipal legislative body to establish speed
limits of less than 25 mph within the center under 23 V.S.A. § 1007(g);
[Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 3. 23 V.S.A. § 1025 is amended to read:
§ 1025. STANDARDS
(a) The To the extent that the U.S. Department of Transportation Federal
Highway Administration’s Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices for
Streets and Highways (MUTCD), as amended, does not conflict with the
provisions of this title and Title 19, it shall be the standards for all traffic
control signs, signals, and markings within the State. The standards set forth in
the MUTCD shall be amended by the Secretary as necessary to comply with
the provisions of this title and Title 19 through the adoption of a supplement.
The supplement shall be adopted pursuant to the provisions of the
VT LEG #386129 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.834
2026 Page 6 of 15
Administrative Procedure Act, 3 V.S.A. chapter 25. Revisions to the MUTCD
shall be adopted according to the implementation or compliance dates
established in federal rules.
(b) To the extent consistent with federal law, projects beyond a preliminary
state of design that are anticipated to be constructed within two years of the
otherwise applicable effective date may be constructed according to the
MUTCD and State supplement standards applicable at the design stage.
(c) Existing signs, signals, and markings shall be valid until such time as
they are replaced or reconstructed. When new traffic control devices are
erected or placed or existing traffic control devices are replaced or repaired, the
equipment, design, method of installation, placement, or repair shall conform
with the MUTCD and the State supplement.
(d) The standards of the MUTCD and the State supplement shall apply for
both State and local authorities as to traffic control devices under their
respective jurisdiction.
* * *
Sec. 4. 23 V.S.A. § 1104 is amended to read:
§ 1104. STOPPING PROHIBITED
(a) Except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic, or in
compliance with law or the directions of an enforcement officer or official
traffic-control device, no person may:
VT LEG #386129 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.834
2026 Page 7 of 15
* * *
(2) Stand or park a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except
momentarily to pick up or discharge a passenger:
* * *
(C) within 20 feet of a marked or unmarked crosswalk at an
intersection or within 15 feet of a marked or unmarked crosswalk where a curb
extension is present;
* * *
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a)(2)(C) of this section,
the legislative body of a municipality may:
(1) establish a different distance from a marked or unmarked crosswalk
in which a vehicle is not permitted to park if:
(A) the distance is established by an ordinance that includes a finding
that the different distance is justified by established traffic standards; and
(B) the distance is marked at each affected crosswalk using paint or a
sign;
(2) permit loading or unloading, or both, by commercial vehicles within
20 feet of a crosswalk, or within 15 feet of a marked or unmarked crosswalk
where a curb extension is present, if:
(A) loading or unloading, or both, by commercial vehicles is
authorized by an ordinance that identifies the affected crosswalks; and
VT LEG #386129 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.834
2026 Page 8 of 15
(B) the areas where loading or unloading, or both, by commercial
vehicles is authorized are marked by paint or a sign; and
(3) permit parking for bicycles or motorized scooters within 20 feet of a
marked or unmarked crosswalk.
Sec. 5. 23 V.S.A. § 1038 is amended to read:
§ 1038. DRIVING ON ROADWAYS LANED FOR TRAFFIC
Whenever any roadway has been divided into two or more clearly marked
lanes for traffic, the following rules shall apply in addition to all others
consistent therewith:
* * *
(2) Upon a roadway that is divided into three lanes and provides for
two-way movement of traffic, a vehicle may be driven in the center lane only
when overtaking and passing another vehicle traveling in the same direction
when the center lane is clear of traffic within a safe distance, or in preparation
for making a left turn, or where the center lane is at the time allocated
exclusively to traffic moving in the same direction that the vehicle is
proceeding and the allocation is designated by official traffic-control devices,
or as provided pursuant to subdivision 1031(a)(2) of this subchapter.
* * *
VT LEG #386129 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.834
2026 Page 9 of 15
Sec. 6. STAKEHOLDER INPUT AND SUPPORT FOR ADOPTION OF
FUTURE UPDATES AND SUPPLEMENTS TO MANUAL ON
UNIFORM TRAFFIC CONTROL DEVICES; REPORT
The Agency of Transportation, in consultation with the Vermont League of
Cities and Towns and the Vermont Association of Planning and Development
Agencies, shall examine the potential for the Agency to collaborate with or
utilize assistance from the Vermont League of Cities and Towns, the Vermont
Association of Planning and Development Agencies, and Vermont
municipalities and regional planning commissions when adopting future
versions of the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices and related
supplements. The Agency shall, on or before January 15, 2027, submit to the
House and Senate Committees on Transportation a written report with its
findings and any recommendations for legislative action.
Sec. 7. BICYCLE AND PEDESTRIAN INFRASTRUCTURE; REPORT
(a) The Agency of Transportation, in consultation with the Vermont
League of Cities and Towns, the Vermont Association of Planning and
Development Agencies, and other relevant stakeholders, shall study the
barriers and challenges to the development and implementation of bicycle and
pedestrian infrastructure projects in Vermont and identify potential approaches
to address those barriers and challenges.
VT LEG #386129 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.834
2026 Page 10 of 15
(b) In conducting the study required pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section, the Agency shall, among other issues, examine:
(1) the ability of smaller municipalities to access funding, including
identifying challenges associated with applying for grants, administrative
burdens, and matching fund requirements;
(2) general funding constraints for municipalities, including the
adequacy of current funding;
(3) impacts related to federal funding requirements on project costs and
timelines;
(4) regulatory and environmental constraints, including permitting
processes and requirements, Act 250 and local zoning review, and federal and
State environmental review requirements;
(5) potential cost barriers, including costs related to right-of-way
acquisition, engineering, construction, and maintenance;
(6) impacts related to competing municipal priorities for transportation
investments, including maintenance or replacement of aging infrastructure,
infrastructure replacement and upgrades related to climate resilience, and
competing active transportation priorities;
(7) design and right-of-way challenges related to the construction of
bicycle and pedestrian improvements along State highways;
VT LEG #386129 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.834
2026 Page 11 of 15
(8) visual and other cues for motor vehicle operators that could make
reductions in the speed limit or the entrance to a downtown center or village
center more apparent, including the use of signage, traffic control devices,
vegetation, or other cues; and
(9) potential institutional and community barriers, including public
perception, interagency coordination, and land use policy inconsistencies.
(c) On or before December 31, 2027, the Agency shall submit a written
report to the House Committees on Environment and on Transportation and to
the Senate Committees on Natural Resources and Energy and on
Transportation. The report shall include the Agency’s findings pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section and shall:
(1) review existing funding mechanisms for bicycle and pedestrian
infrastructure and their utilization by municipalities;
(2) present case studies of successful and unsuccessful bicycle and
pedestrian infrastructure projects;
(3) identify potential legislative and rule changes to reduce barriers to
municipal construction of bicycle and pedestrian infrastructure;
(4) recommend approaches to improve technical assistance to small
municipalities exploring or undertaking bicycle and pedestrian infrastructure
projects;
VT LEG #386129 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.834
2026 Page 12 of 15
(5) identify opportunities to increase the capacity of small municipalities
to undertake bicycle and pedestrian infrastructure projects;
(6) propose strategies to streamline the State permitting and funding
application processes;
(7) propose potential lower-cost strategies to increase pedestrian and
bicycle safety in downtown centers and village centers; and
(8) evaluate alternative funding models and other opportunities to
increase investment in bicycle and pedestrian infrastructure.
Sec. 8. INCREASED UTILIZATION OF CLASS 1 TOWN HIGHWAYS;
TASK FORCE; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Class 1 Town Highway Task Force to
examine potential opportunities to increase the amount of State highways in
downtown centers and village centers that are reclassified as class 1 town
highways.
(b) Membership. The Task Force shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Secretary of Transportation or designee;
(2) the Secretary of Commerce and Community Development or
designee;
(3) the Chair of the Vermont Association of Planning and Development
Agencies or designee;
VT LEG #386129 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.834
2026 Page 13 of 15
(4) the Executive Director of the Vermont League of Cities and Towns
or designee;
(5) the State Director of AARP Vermont or designee;
(6) the Executive Director of Local Motion or designee; and
(7) the Executive Director of the Vermont Public Transit Association or
designee.
(c) Powers and duties. The Task Force shall study opportunities to increase
the amount of State highways in downtown centers and village centers that are
reclassified as class 1 town highways. In conducting its study, the Task Force
shall actively engage with and seek input from stakeholders and other
interested parties. The Task Force’s study shall include the following issues:
(1) opportunities to increase municipal maintenance funding;
(2) potential measures to allow municipalities to raise additional funding
for the maintenance of class 1 town highways, including potential statutory
changes or changes to State grant programs;
(3) potential changes to State funding for municipal highways and
transportation infrastructure, including changes to existing grant programs and
the development of State revenue streams dedicated to municipal highways;
and
(4) potential changes to maintenance practices and equipment, including
changes to snow plows and snow removal equipment, to enable the
VT LEG #386129 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.834
2026 Page 14 of 15
development of locally appropriate pedestrian and bicycle infrastructure and
safety interventions.
(d) Assistance. The Task Force shall have the administrative, technical,
and legal assistance of the Agencies of Transportation and of Commerce and
Community Development.
(e) Report. On or before January 15, 2027, the Task Force shall submit a
written report to the House and Senate Committees on Transportation with its
findings and any recommendations for legislative action.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The Secretary of Transportation shall call the first meeting of the
Task Force to occur on or before September 15, 2026.
(2) The Task Force shall select a chair from among its members at the
first meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Task Force shall cease to exist on January 30, 2027.
Sec. 9. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Sec. 3 (adoption of MUTCD and supplements) shall take effect on July
1, 2027, and shall apply beginning with the Agency of Transportation’s
adoption of the next edition of the federal Manual on Uniform Traffic Control
Devices.
VT LEG #386129 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.834
2026 Page 15 of 15
(b) This section and the remaining sections shall take effect on July 1,
2026.
VT LEG #386129 v.3